Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Standards of Conduct

271B.8-300.
General standards for directors — Directors of a public benefit corporation.

A director shall discharge his duties as a director, including his duties as a member of a committee:

In good faith;

On an informed basis; and

In a manner he honestly believes to be in the best interests of the corporation.

A director shall be considered to discharge his duties on an informed basis if he makes, with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, inquiry into the business and affairs of the corporation, or into a particular action to be taken or decision to be made.

In discharging his duties a director shall be entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One (1) or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director honestly believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the director honestly believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence; or

A committee of the board of directors of which he is not a member, if the director honestly believes the committee merits confidence.

A director shall not be considered to be acting in good faith if he has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (3) of this section unwarranted.

In addition to any other limitation on a director’s liability for monetary damages contained in any provision of the corporation’s articles of incorporation adopted in accordance with subsection (2)(d) of KRS

271B.2-020

, any action taken as a director, or any failure to take any action as a director, shall not be the basis for monetary damages or injunctive relief unless:

The director has breached or failed to perform the duties of the director’s office in compliance with this section; and

In the case of an action for monetary damages, the breach or failure to perform constitutes willful misconduct or wanton or reckless disregard for the best interests of the corporation and its shareholders.

A person bringing an action for monetary damages under this section shall have the burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence the provisions of subsection (5)(a) and (b) of this section, and the burden of proving that the breach or failure to perform was the legal cause of damages suffered by the corporation.

Nothing in this section shall eliminate or limit the liability of any director for any act or omission occurring prior to July 15, 1988.

In a public benefit corporation:

The board of directors shall manage or direct the business and affairs of the public benefit corporation in a manner that balances the pecuniary interests of the stockholders, the best interests of those materially affected by the corporation’s conduct, and the specific public benefit or public benefits identified in its articles of incorporation;

A director of the public benefit corporation shall not, by virtue of the public benefit provisions set forth in the corporation’s articles of incorporation, have any duty to any person on account of any interest of the person in the public benefit or public benefits identified in the articles of incorporation or on account of any interest materially affected by the corporation’s conduct;

With respect to a decision implicating the balance requirement inparagraph (a) of this subsection, a director shall act in conformity with subsection (1) of this section; and

The articles of incorporation of a public benefit corporation may include a provision that any disinterested failure to satisfy this subsection shall not constitute an act or omission not in good faith or a breach of the duty of loyalty.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 85, effective January 1, 1989; 1988, ch. 224, § 8, effective July 15, 1988; 2017 ch. 28, § 7, effective June 29, 2017.

271B.8-310.
Director conflict of interest.

A conflict of interest transaction shall be a transaction with the corporation in which a director of the corporation has a direct or indirect interest. A conflict of interest transaction shall not be voidable by the corporation solely because of the director’s interest in the transaction if any one (1) of the following is true:

The material facts of the transaction and the director’s interest were disclosed or known to the board of directors or a committee of the board of directors and the board of directors or committee authorized, approved, or ratified the transaction;

The material facts of the transaction and the director’s interest were disclosed or known to the shareholders entitled to vote and they authorized, approved, or ratified the transaction; or

The transaction was fair to the corporation.

For purposes of this section, a director of the corporation shall have an indirect interest in a transaction if:

Another entity in which he has a material financial interest or in which he is a general partner is a party to the transaction; or

Another entity of which he is a director, officer, or trustee is a party to the transaction and the transaction is or should be considered by the board of directors of the corporation.

For purposes of subsection (1)(a) of this section, a conflict of interest transaction shall be considered authorized, approved, or ratified if it receives the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors on the board of directors (or on the committee) who have no direct or indirect interest in the transaction, but a transaction shall not be authorized, approved, or ratified under this section by a single director. If a majority of the directors who have no direct or indirect interest in the transaction vote to authorize, approve, or ratify the transaction, a quorum shall be present for the purpose of taking action under this section. The presence of, or a vote cast by, a director with a direct or indirect interest in the transaction shall not affect the validity of any action taken under subsection (1)(a) of this section if the transaction is otherwise authorized, approved, or ratified as provided in that subsection.

For purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this section, a conflict of interest transaction shall be considered authorized, approved, or ratified if it receives the vote of a majority of the shares entitled to be counted under this subsection. Shares owned by or voted under the control of a director who has a direct or indirect interest in the transaction, and shares owned by or voted under the control of an entity described in subsection (2)(a) of this section, may not be counted in a vote of shareholders to determine whether to authorize, approve, or ratify a conflict of interest transaction under subsection (1)(b) of this section. The vote of those shares, however, shall be counted in determining whether the transaction is approved under other sections of this chapter. A majority of the shares that are entitled to be counted in a vote on the transaction under this subsection shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of taking action under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 86, effective January 1, 1989; 1988, ch. 224, § 9, effective July 15, 1988.

271B.8-320.
Loans to directors.

Except as provided by subsection (3) of this section, a corporation may not lend money to or guarantee the obligation of a director of the corporation unless:

The particular loan or guarantee is approved by a majority of the votes represented by the outstanding voting shares of all classes, voting as a single voting group, except the votes of shares owned by or voted under the control of the benefited director; or

The corporation’s board of directors determines that the loan or guarantee benefits the corporation and either approves the specific loan or guarantee or a general plan authorizing loans and guarantees.

The fact that a loan or guarantee is made in violation of this section shall not affect the borrower’s liability on the loan or the corporation’s liability on the guarantee.

This section shall not apply to loans and guarantees authorized by statute regulating any special class of corporations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 87, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.8-330.
Liability for unlawful distributions.

A director who votes for or who assents to a distribution made in violation of KRS

271B.6-400

or the articles of incorporation shall be personally liable to the corporation for the amount of the distribution that exceeds what could have been distributed without violating KRS

271B.6-400

or the articles of incorporation if it is established that he did not perform his duties in compliance with KRS

271B.8-300

. In any proceeding commenced under this section, a director shall have all of the defenses ordinarily available to a director.

A director held liable under subsection (1) of this section for an unlawful distribution shall be entitled to contribution:

From every other director who could be held liable under subsection (1) of this section for the unlawful distribution; and

From each shareholder for the amount the shareholder accepted knowing the distribution was made in violation of KRS

271B.6-400

or the articles of incorporation.

A proceeding under this section shall be barred unless it is commenced within two (2) years after the date on which the effect of the distribution was measured under subsection (5) or (7) of KRS

271B.6-400

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 88, effective January 1, 1989.